Missouri, session 2026, HB2934.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.601, 67.604, 67.607, 67.651, 67.652, 67.653, 67.657, and
99.585, RSMo, are repealed and nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 67.601, 67.604, 67.607, 67.618, 67.651, 67.652, 67.653, 67.657, and 99.585, to read
as follows:
67.601. 1. In each constitutional charter city not within a county and each
constitutional charter county adjoining such city there is hereby established a "Regional
Convention and Visitors Commission", to consist of eleven members, five of whom shall be
appointed by the chief executive of the city and six of whom shall be appointed by the chief
executive of the county. Of the members so appointed, two members appointed by the county
executive and only two members and one member appointed by the city executive and only
one member shall be representatives of the hotel and motel industry, one member appointed
by the city executive shall be a representative of the restaurant industry, and one member
appointed by the city executive shall be a representative from a major tourist attraction. Of
the members first appointed, two members and only two members appointed by the city
executive and two members appointed by the county executive shall be appointed for a term
of three years, two members appointed by the city executive and two members appointed by
the county executive shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one member appointed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2934 2
by the city executive and two members appointed by the county executive shall be appointed
for a term of one year. Thereafter, each member appointed shall serve a four-year term. The
chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the county shall designate, in alternate
years, one of the members appointed by him to be chairman. All members shall serve without
compensation. Any vacancy shall be filled by the respective chief executive officer. The
commission shall elect its own treasurer, secretary and such other officers as it deems
necessary and expedient, and it may make such rules, regulations, and bylaws consistent with
sections 67.601 to 67.626 to effectuate its purposes as it deems necessary.
2. Any provision of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, the
terms of all members of the regional convention and visitors commission established by
subsection 1 of this section shall terminate August 28, 1991. Thereafter, but ending August
28, 2026, such regional convention and visitors commission shall consist of eleven members,
five of whom shall be appointed by the chief executive of the city with the approval of the
governing body of the city, five of whom shall be appointed by the chief executive of the
county, and one of whom shall be appointed by the governor from a panel of three nominees
submitted jointly by the city executive and the county executive and who shall serve as
chairman. Of the members so appointed not less than three members appointed by the county
executive and not less than three members appointed by the city executive shall be individuals
actively engaged in the hotel and motel industry and one member appointed by the city
executive shall be a representative of the restaurant industry. Of the members first appointed,
two members appointed by the city executive and two members appointed by the county
executive shall be appointed for a term of three years, two members appointed by the city
executive and two members appointed by the county executive shall be appointed for a term
of two years, and one member appointed by the city executive and one member appointed by
the county executive shall be appointed for a term of one year. Thereafter, each member
appointed by the city executive or the county executive shall serve a four-year term. The
member appointed by the governor shall serve a two-year term. All members shall serve
without compensation. Any vacancy shall be filled by the respective chief executive officer.
The commission shall elect its own treasurer, secretary and such other officers as it deems
necessary and expedient, and it may make such rules, regulations and bylaws consistent with
sections 67.601 to 67.626 to effectuate its purposes as it deems necessary.
3. [In the event the state of Missouri or the city or the county fails to make any
appropriation or to pay any rents, fees or charges provided in any lease among the regional
convention and sports complex authority established by section 67.650 and the state of
Missouri, the city and the county, of a facility of such authority with respect to which the
regional convention and visitors commission has contracted to provide operations or
management services, the member of the regional convention and visitors commission

HB 2934 3
appointed by the governor, if the state of Missouri has failed to make such appropriation or to
pay such rents, fees or charges, and the members of such commission appointed by the chief
executive of the city or county, if the city or county, as applicable, has failed to make such
appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or charges, shall be disqualified from voting on any
matter, action or resolution to come before such commission, and from participating in any of
the business of such commission, so long as any such failure continues. If less than a
majority of the members then appointed are thereby qualified to vote, the members that
remain qualified to vote shall constitute a quorum and any action of the commission which is
approved by a majority of such qualified members shall be binding upon the commission.](1)
Beginning August 28, 2026, membership of the regional convention and visitors
commission shall be increased by four members who shall be appointed by the governor.
The commission thereafter shall consist of fifteen total members, with specific members
appointed as follows:
(a) Of the five members appointed by the governor:
a. One shall be designated by the governor to serve as the chair of the
commission;
b. Three shall be representatives of the hotel and motel industry;
c. Two shall be residents of a county with more than one million inhabitants; and
d. Two shall be residents of a city not within a county;
(b) Of the five members appointed by the chief executive of the city, who shall be
residents of the city and whose appointments shall require the approval of the governing
body of the city:
a. One shall be a representative of the restaurant industry;
b. One shall be a representative of a major tourist attraction; and
c. Three shall be representatives of the hotel and motel industry;
(c) Of the five members appointed by the chief executive of the county, who shall
be residents of the county and whose appointments shall require the approval of the
governing body of the county, three shall be representatives of the hotel and motel
industry.
(2) Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2 of this section and subdivision (1) of this
subsection, all members of the regional convention and visitors commission serving as of
August 28, 2026, shall remain as members of the commission such that no then-serving
member shall be subject to the requirements of subparagraph b. of paragraph (b) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection and shall continue to serve until the expiration of the
term for which they were appointed, or until their successors are duly appointed and
qualified. The four additional members of the regional convention and visitors
commission appointed by the governor under subdivision (1) of this subsection on

HB 2934 4
August 28, 2026, shall be selected from persons appointed by the governor who were on
August 27, 2026, serving as commissioners of the regional convention and sports
complex authority established under section 67.650, and such additional members so
appointed shall be deemed qualified and shall not be subject to the requirements of
subparagraph b. of paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection for so long as such
members remain as members of the commission, provided that such requirements shall
apply to their successors. Of the members so appointed to the regional convention and
visitors commission on August 28, 2026, two members shall be appointed for a term of
four years, one member shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one member
shall be appointed for a term of one year. Thereafter, all such appointments or
reappointments shall be for a period of four years. The membership of the regional
convention and visitors commission as of August 28, 2026, following the selection by the
100 governor of the four additional members of the regional convention and visitors
101 commission pursuant to this subdivision, shall comply with subparagraphs c. and d. of
102 paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
103 (3) All members shall serve without compensation. Any vacancy shall be filled
104 by the respective chief executive officer or governor, as applicable. The commission
105 shall elect its own treasurer, secretary, and such other officers as it deems necessary and
106 expedient, and it may make such rules, regulations, and bylaws consistent with sections
107 67.601 to 67.626 and sections 67.650 to 67.658 as it deems necessary to effectuate its
108 purposes. The commission shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the
109 state of Missouri.
67.604. For purposes of sections 67.601 to 67.626, the following terms mean:
(1) "Business", any activity engaged in by any person, or caused to be engaged in by
him, with the object of gain, benefit or advantage, either direct or indirect, and the
classification of which business is of such a character as to be subject to the terms of sections
67.601 to 67.626;
(2) "City", a constitutional charter city not within a county;
(3) "Commission", the regional convention and visitors commission created in
section 67.601;
(4) "Convention district", the real property located in the city or the county that
contains an existing convention center; sports stadium; sports practice facility and field
houses; playing fields; outdoor convention, recreational, and entertainment facilities
and centers; and parking facilities; that is leased, owned, maintained, or operated by or
on behalf of the commission, including any expansion thereof or acquisition that shall
immediately become part of the convention district;

HB 2934 5
(5) "County", a constitutional charter county adjoining a constitutional charter city
not within a county;
[(5)] (6) "District", the regional cultural and performing arts development district
created in section 67.627;
[(6)] (7) "Election authority", the election authority having jurisdiction over the
area in which the boundaries of the convention district are located under chapter 115;
(8) "Hotel and motel industry", the group of enterprises actively engaged in the
business of operating lodging facilities for transient guests;
[(7)] (9) "Person", any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association,
corporation whether municipal or private and whether organized for profit or not, estate, trust,
business trust, receiver or trustee appointed by any state or federal court, syndicate, or any
other group or combination acting as a unit;
(10) "Qualified voters", for purposes of elections for approval of sales taxes:
(a) Registered voters; or
(b) If no registered voters reside within the convention district, the owners of one
or more parcels of real property located within the convention district based on the tax
records of real property for the county clerk as of the thirtieth day before the date of the
applicable election;
(11) "Registered voters", persons who reside within the convention district and
who are qualified and registered to vote under chapter 115, pursuant to the records of
the election authority as of the thirtieth day before the date of the applicable election;
[(8)] (12) "Transient guest", a person who occupies a room or rooms in a hotel or
motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
67.607. Each regional convention and visitors commission is empowered to:
(1) Develop and execute plans, policies, and programs exclusively to promote
convention and tourist business within the area of the city and county involved;
(2) Cooperate and act jointly with other agencies, bureaus, boards, and associations to
promote conventions and tourist business within the area of the city and county involved;
(3) Contract with any public or private agency, individual, partnership, association,
corporation or other legal entity for the furnishing of services and supplies for promotion of
convention and tourist business within the city and county involved;
(4) Lease and sublease[, for a period not to exceed forty years, contract to bear the
cost of operating] an existing convention center, including any [adjoining southern or
eastward] expansion thereof, and to operate such facilities; and to provide services to visitors
to the area of the city and county involved;

HB 2934 6
(5) Develop, devise, promote, fund or contribute to the support of advertising and
public relations campaigns designed or intended to promote conventions and tourism in the
area of the city and county involved, or parts thereof;
(6) Contract for, or exact, a charge from any person in connection with the use,
enjoyment, purchase, license, or lease of any property or facility operated under lease by the
commission, or any activity, exhibit, function, or personnel of the commission;
(7) Appoint a director and necessary assistants, to fix their compensation and to
remove such appointees;
(8) Execute contracts and sue and be sued;
(9) Contract with the county and city, or any convention and visitors bureau thereof,
involved to allow such county or city, or any convention and visitors bureau thereof, to pay
over to the commission the proceeds of any convention and tourism tax or gross receipts tax
on hotels and motels imposed by such county or city for the purpose of promoting
conventions and tourism, or providing and maintaining facilities therefor or sales tax on the
amount of sales or charges for rooms paid by transient guests of hotels and motels imposed by
such county or city pursuant to section 67.657;
(10) Contract with any public or private agency, individual, partnership, association,
corporation or other legal entity to provide for limitations on marketing or use or both of the
facilities referred to in subdivision (4) of this section or other special purpose civic facilities
for assembly, display and entertainment which are owned, leased or operated, in whole or in
part, by the city or the county;
(11) Exercise all powers, duties, rights, authority, and obligations on behalf of
the regional convention and sports complex authority created under section 67.650 and
as set forth in sections 67.650 to 67.658 including, but not limited to, those powers and
duties under section 67.653;
(12) Develop, devise, promote, fund, or contribute to the support and
development of sports and entertainment attractions including, but not limited to,
collegiate, amateur, and professional sports;
(13) Levy and collect special assessments and taxes as provided in sections 67.601
to 67.626; and
(14) Levy sales taxes under sections 67.601 to 67.626.
67.618. 1. The commission may levy by resolution one or more special
assessments against real property within the boundaries of the convention district upon
receipt of and in accordance with a petition signed by:
(1) Owners of real property collectively owning more than fifty percent by
assessed value of real property within the boundaries of the convention district; and

HB 2934 7
(2) More than fifty percent per capita of the owners of all real property within
the boundaries of the convention district.
2. The special assessment petition shall be in substantially the following form:
The commission shall be authorized to levy special assessments against real
property within the convention district (the "District") for the purpose of
providing revenue for maintenance, construction, reconstruction, operations,
rehabilitation, installations, and financing of improvements located within the
District and entering into one or more contracts related thereto for any of the
foregoing or any other necessary or desirable improvement to be made within
such District, such special assessments to be levied against each tract, lot, or
parcel of real property listed below within the District which receives special
benefit as a result of such use of the assessment, the cost of which shall be
allocated by [insert method of allocation, which shall be any reasonable method
including, but not limited to, the imposition of an assessment upon the gross
revenue generated from charges for tickets, passes, entrance fees, admission fees,
or other similar charges or impositions permitting the attendance of events
within the District, as allocated and imposed on a reasonable basis], with such
special assessment to be in the maximum amount of [insert unit of measurement,
which may include but not be limited to, basing such measurement on gross
revenues generated from charges for tickets, passes, entrance fees, admission
tickets, or similar charges]. Such authorization to levy the special assessment
shall expire on [insert date]. The tracts of land located in the District which will
receive special benefits from such services, projects, or improvements are [insert
list of properties by common addresses and legal descriptions].
3. The method for allocating such special assessments shall be set forth in the
petition and may be any reasonable method which results in imposing assessments upon
real property benefited in relation to the benefit conferred upon each respective tract,
lot, or parcel of real property and the cost to provide such benefit. The commission may
establish different classes, based on classification of real property or any other
reasonable basis, within the district for purposes of special assessments. The levy rate
for special assessments may vary for each class or subclass.
4. By resolution, the commission may levy a special assessment rate lower than
the rate ceiling set forth in the petition authorizing the special assessment and may
increase such lowered special assessment rate to a level not exceeding the special
assessment rate ceiling set forth in the petition without further approval of the real
property owners.

HB 2934 8
5. Each special assessment that is due and owing shall constitute a perpetual lien
against each tract, lot, or parcel of property from which it is derived. Such lien may be
foreclosed in the same manner as any other special assessment lien as provided in
section 88.861. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection and section 67.1541 to
the contrary, the county collector may, upon certification by the commission, add each
special assessment to the annual real estate tax bill for the property and collect the
assessment in the same manner the collector uses for real estate taxes. Any special
assessment remaining unpaid on the first day of January annually is delinquent and
enforcement of collection of the delinquent bill by the county collector shall be governed
by the laws concerning delinquent and back taxes. The lien may be foreclosed in the
same manner as a tax upon real property by land sale under chapter 140 or, if
applicable to that county, chapter 141.
6. A separate fund or account shall be created by the commission for each
special assessment levied and each fund or account shall be identifiable by a suitable
title. The proceeds of such assessment shall be credited to such fund or account. Such
fund or account shall be used solely to pay the costs incurred in undertaking the
specified service project.
7. Upon completion of the service or project or both as set forth in the petition,
the balance remaining in the fund or account established for such service or project or
both shall be returned or credited against the amount of the original assessment of each
parcel of property pro rata based on the method of assessment of such special
assessment.
8. Any funds in a fund or account created under this section that are not needed
for current expenditures may be invested by the commission in accordance with
applicable laws relating to the investment of funds of the city in which the convention
district is located.
9. The authority of the district to levy special assessments shall be independent
of the limitations and authorities of the municipality in which it is located; specifically,
the provisions of section 88.812 shall not apply to the commission.
10. In addition to the sales tax authorized in subsection 2 of section 67.619, the
commission may impose by resolution a convention district sales and use tax on all retail
sales made in such district that are subject to taxation under sections 144.010 to 144.525,
except sales of motor vehicles, trailers, boats or outboard motors, and sales to or by
public utilities and providers of communications, cable, or video services. Any sales and
use tax imposed under this section may be imposed in increments of one-eighth of one
percent, up to a maximum of two percent. Such convention district sales and use tax
may be imposed for the purposes designated by the commissioners of the commission in

HB 2934 9
the convention district's ballot of submission to its qualified voters, except that no
resolution adopted under this section shall become effective unless the commission
submits to the qualified voters of the convention district, by mail-in ballot, a proposal to
authorize a sales and use tax under this section. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters on the proposed sales tax are in favor of the sales tax, the resolution is
adopted. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters are opposed to the sales
tax, the resolution is void.
11. The ballot for the sales and use tax contemplated in subsection 10 of this
section shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the regional convention and visitors commission impose a convention
district sales and use tax at the maximum rate of ____ (insert amount) for the
purpose of providing revenue for the promotion of regional conventions and
tourism and to support the ongoing upkeep, maintenance, and operations of the
commission and its facilities, and any other lawful purpose under sections 67.601
to 67.626?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES". If
you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
12. Within ten days after the qualified voters have approved the imposition of
the sales and use tax, the commission shall, in accordance with section 32.087, notify the
director of the department of revenue. The sales and use tax authorized by this section
100 shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director
101 of the department of revenue receives notice of the adoption of such tax.
102 13. For any sales and use tax imposed under subsection 10 of this section, every
103 retailer shall add such additional tax imposed by the commission to such retailer's sale
104 price, and when so added such tax shall constitute a part of the purchase price, shall be
105 a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the
106 same manner as the purchase price.
107 14. In order to allow retailers to collect and report the sales and use tax
108 authorized by subsection 10 of this section, as well as all other sales and use taxes
109 required by law in the simplest and most efficient manner practicable, the commission
110 may establish appropriate brackets to be used in the district imposing a tax under this
111 section in lieu of the brackets provided in section 144.285.
112 15. The penalties provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525 shall apply to violations
113 of this section.

HB 2934 10
114 16. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 115, an election for the convention
115 district sales and use tax under subsection 10 of this section shall be conducted in
116 accordance with the provisions of this section.
67.651. As used in sections 67.650 to 67.658, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authority", the regional convention and sports complex authority created in
section 67.650;
(2) "Bond", any bond, including refunding bonds, notes, interim certificates,
debentures, or other obligations issued by an authority pursuant to section 67.653;
(3) "Chief executive", the mayor of the city and the county executive of the county;
(4) "City", a constitutional charter city not within a county;
(5) "Commission", the regional convention and visitors commission created
under section 67.601;
(6) "County", a constitutional charter county adjoining a constitutional charter city
not within a county;
[(6)] (7) "Governing body", the board of aldermen charged with governing the city
and the county council charged with governing the county;
[(7)] (8) "Multiple purposes", all purposes for which a building operated by the
authority can legally be used, including multiple sports;
[(8)] (9) "Transient guest", a person who occupies a room or rooms in a hotel or motel
for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
67.652. 1. The authority shall consist of up to eleven commissioners who shall be
qualified voters of the state of Missouri and residents of either the city or the county. The
commissioners first appointed shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Up to three commissioners who shall be residents of the city may be appointed by
the chief executive of the city with the advice and consent of the board of aldermen;
(2) Up to three commissioners who shall be residents of the county may be appointed
by the chief executive of the county with the advice and consent of the county council; and
(3) Up to five commissioners one of whom shall be the chairman, two of whom shall
be a resident of the city, two of whom shall be a resident of the county and one of whom shall
be a resident of the city, the county or a county contiguous to the county, may be appointed by
the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall appoint one of the
commissioners to be the chairman of the authority. Of the commissioners appointed by the
chief executive of the city, no more than two shall be of the same political party, of the
commissioners appointed by the chief executive of the county, no more than two shall be of
the same political party and of the commissioners appointed by the governor, no more than
three shall be of the same political party. In addition, no elective or appointed official of the
state of Missouri or of any political subdivision thereof shall be a commissioner of the

HB 2934 11
authority. Upon the appointment of eight commissioners as above provided, the authority
shall be deemed to be duly constituted and shall be authorized to commence operations as
provided in sections 67.650 to 67.658; but, after the authority is duly constituted nothing
herein shall prohibit the appointment of additional commissioners up to the limits and in the
manner provided in this section.
2. The commissioners shall serve for terms of six years, except that of the first such
commissioners appointed, the first person, if any, appointed by the governor, the chief
executive of the city and the chief executive of the county, respectively, shall serve for terms
of two years, the next two persons, if any, appointed by the governor, and the next person, if
any, appointed by the chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the county,
respectively, shall serve for terms of four years, and the final persons, if any, appointed by the
governor, the chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the county, respectively,
shall serve for terms of six years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has
been appointed and qualified. No more than six commissioners of the authority shall be of
the same political party.
3. In the event a vacancy exists or in the event a commissioner's term expires, a
successor commissioner shall be appointed by whomever appointed the commissioner who
initially held the vacant position and if no person is so selected within sixty days of the
creation of the vacancy, the unexpired term of such commissioner may be filled by a majority
vote of the remainder of the commissioners, provided that such successor commissioner shall
meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 above. Commissioners
appointed to fill unexpired terms shall only serve until such unexpired term expires. Pending
any such appointment to fill any vacancy, the remaining commissioners may conduct
authority business.
4. The authority shall elect from its number a chairman and may appoint such officers
and employ such employees as it may require for the performance of its duties, and may fix
and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. No action of the authority shall
be binding unless taken at a meeting at which at least a majority of the commissioners then
appointed vote in favor of such action. The commissioners shall be reimbursed by the
authority for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
5. In the event any of the state of Missouri, the city or the county fails to make any
appropriation or to pay any rents, fees or charges provided in any contract, agreement lease or
sublease between the authority and one or more of the state of Missouri, the city and the
county, the commissioners, if any, appointed by the governor, if the state of Missouri has
failed to make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or charges, and the
commissioners, if any, appointed by the chief executive of the city or county, if the city or
county, as applicable, has failed to make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or

HB 2934 12
charges, shall be disqualified from voting on any matter, action or resolution to come before
the authority, and from participating in any of the business of the authority, so long as any
such failure continues. If less than a majority of the commissioners then appointed are
thereby qualified to vote, the commissioners that remain qualified to vote shall constitute a
quorum and any action of the authority which is approved by a majority of such qualified
commissioners, shall be binding upon the authority.
6. (1) Notwithstanding provisions of subsections 1 to 5 of this section to the
contrary, beginning August 28, 2026, the terms of the existing commissioners for the
authority shall expire and terminate and the members serving on the regional
convention and visitors commission created in section 67.601 shall serve as the new
commissioners of the authority. Any commissioner serving for the authority prior to
August 28, 2026, shall be replaced by members of the regional convention and visitors
commission regardless of whether the terms of such commissioners have expired. Each
member serving on the regional convention and visitors commission shall serve as a
commissioner for the authority, with such terms, vacancies, and appointments handled
in the same manner as set forth under sections 67.601 to 67.626.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, four commissioners of the
authority, selected by the governor, who were previously appointed by the governor and
serving as of August 27, 2026, shall be reappointed on August 28, 2026, to serve as
members of the newly constituted regional convention and visitors commission in
accordance with the terms of subsection 3 of section 67.601.
67.653. 1. The authority shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by gift, bequest, purchase, lease or sublease from public or private
sources and to plan, construct, operate and maintain, or to lease or sublease to or from others
for construction, operation and maintenance, convention centers, sports stadiums, field
houses, indoor and outdoor convention, recreational, and entertainment facilities and centers,
playing fields, parking facilities and other suitable concessions, and all things incidental or
necessary to a complex suitable for all types of convention, entertainment and meeting
activities and for all types of sports and recreation, either professional or amateur, commercial
or private, either upon, above or below the ground, except that no such stadium, complex or
facility shall be used, in any fashion, for the purpose of horse racing or dog racing, and any
stadium, complex or facility newly constructed by the authority shall be suitable for multiple
purposes [and designed and constructed to meet National Football League franchise standards
and shall be located adjacent to an existing convention facility];
(2) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(3) To maintain an office, and to conduct its meetings at such place or places in the
city or in the county as it may designate;

HB 2934 13
(4) To charge and collect fees and rents for use of the facilities owned or operated by
it or leased or subleased from or to others and to deposit any funds received under the
provisions of sections 67.650 to 67.658 in a savings or checking account in a bank, credit
union, or savings and loan association in this state;
(5) To adopt a common seal;
(6) To contract and to be contracted with, including, but without limitation, the
authority to enter into contracts with cities, counties and other political subdivisions and
public agencies under sections 70.210 to 70.325, and otherwise, and to enter into contracts
with other entities, in connection with the acquisition by gift, bequest, purchase, lease or
sublease and in connection with the planning, construction, financing, leasing, subleasing,
operation and maintenance of any convention or sports facility and for any other lawful
purpose, and to sue and to be sued;
(7) To receive for its lawful activities any rentals, contributions or moneys
appropriated or otherwise designated for payment to the authority by municipalities, counties,
state or other political subdivisions or public agencies or by the federal government or any
agency or officer thereof or from any other source;
(8) To disburse funds for its lawful activities and fix salaries and wages of its officers
and employees;
(9) To invest any of the authority's funds in such types of investments as shall be
determined by a resolution adopted by the commissioners of the authority;
(10) To borrow money for the acquisition, planning, construction, equipping,
operation, maintenance, repair, extension and improvement of any facility, or any part or parts
thereof, which it has the power to own, lease or operate, and for any other proper corporate
purpose, and to issue negotiable notes, bonds, or other instruments in writing as evidence of
sums borrowed, as hereinafter provided in this section:
(a) Bonds issued hereunder shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted by the
commissioners of the authority which shall set out the estimated cost to the authority of the
proposed facility or facilities, and shall further set out the amount of bonds to be issued, their
purpose or purposes, their date or dates, denomination or denominations, rate or rates of
interest, time or times of payment, both of principal and of interest, place or places of
payment and all other details in connection therewith. Any such bonds may be subject to
such provision for redemption prior to maturity, with or without premium, and at such times
and upon such conditions as may be provided by the resolution;
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 108.170, such bonds shall bear interest
at such rate or rates determined by the authority and shall mature within a period not
exceeding fifty years and may be sold at public or private sale for not less than ninety-five

HB 2934 14
percent of the principal amount thereof. Bonds issued by the authority shall possess all of the
qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of this state;
(c) Such bonds may be payable to bearer, may be registered or coupon bonds and if
payable to bearer, may contain such registration provisions as to either principal and interest,
or principal only, as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the same, which resolution
may also provide for the exchange of registered and coupon bonds. Such bonds and any
coupons attached thereto shall be signed in such manner and by such officers of the authority
as may be provided for by the resolution authorizing the same. The authority may provide for
the replacement of any bond which shall become mutilated, destroyed or lost;
(d) Bonds issued by the authority shall be payable as to principal, interest and
redemption premium, if any, out of all or any part of the general funds of the authority,
including rents, revenues, receipts and income derived and to be derived for the use of any
facility or combination of facilities, or any part or parts thereof, acquired, constructed,
improved or extended in whole or in part from the proceeds of such bonds, including but not
limited to convention center and stadium rentals, concessions, parking facilities and from
funds derived from any other facilities or part or parts thereof, owned or operated by the
authority, all or any part of which rents, revenues, receipts and income the authority is
authorized to pledge for the payment of said principal, interest, and redemption premium, if
any, except that direct appropriations of tax revenues received by the authority pursuant to
sections 67.656 and 67.657 or otherwise, other than appropriations for the payment of rent,
shall not be pledged for the payment of such bonds. Neither the commissioners of the
authority nor any person executing its bonds shall be personally liable on such bonds by
reason of the issuance thereof. Bonds issued under the provisions of sections 67.653 to
67.655 shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of this state, or any political
subdivision of this state, nor shall any such obligations be a pledge of the faith and credit of
this state, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and assets held by the authority. The
issuance of bonds under sections 67.653 to 67.655 shall not, directly, indirectly, or
contingently, obligate the state of Missouri or any political subdivision thereof, or the
authority, to levy any form of taxation therefor or to make any appropriation for their
payment. Each obligation or bond issued under sections 67.653 to 67.655 shall contain on the
face thereof a statement to the effect that the authority shall not be obligated to pay the same
nor the interest on such bond, except from the revenues received by the authority or assets of
the authority lawfully pledged therefor, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing
power of this state or of any political subdivision of this state is pledged to the payment of the
principal of or the interest on such obligation or bond. Bonds issued pursuant to this section
may be further secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, pledge agreement,
assignment or security agreement upon the rents, revenues, receipts and income herein

HB 2934 15
referred to or any part thereof, or upon any leasehold interest or other property owned by the
authority, or any part thereof, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, except that direct
appropriations of tax revenues received by the authority pursuant to sections 67.656 and
67.657 or otherwise, other than appropriations for the payment of rent, shall not secure such
bonds. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed in such manner and under such
restrictions as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such
bonds or in any such mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, pledge agreement or security
agreement;
(e) The authority shall fix and maintain rates and rentals and make and collect charges
for the use and services of its interest in the facility or facilities or any part thereof owned or
100 operated by the authority which shall be sufficient to pay the cost of operation and
101 maintenance thereof, to pay the principal of and interest on any such bonds payable from such
102 rates, rentals and charges and to provide funds sufficient to meet all requirements of the
103 resolution by which such bonds have been issued;
104 (f) The resolution authorizing the issuance of any such bonds may provide for the
105 allocation of rents, revenues, receipts and income derived and to be derived by the authority
106 from the use of any facility or part thereof, and of the proceeds received pursuant to sections
107 67.656 and 67.657, into such separate accounts as shall be deemed to be advisable to assure
108 the proper operation and maintenance of any facility or part thereof and the prompt payment
109 of any bonds issued to finance all or any part of the costs thereof. Such accounts may include
110 reserve accounts necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of any such facility or
111 any part thereof, and for the payment of any such bonds. Such resolution may include such
112 other covenants and agreements by the authority as in its judgment are advisable or necessary
113 properly to secure the payment of such bonds;
114 (g) The authority may issue negotiable refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding,
115 extending or unifying the whole or any part of such bonds then outstanding, or any bonds,
116 notes or other obligations issued by any other public agency, public body or political
117 subdivision in connection with any facilities to be acquired, leased or subleased by the
118 authority, which refunding bonds shall not exceed the amount necessary to refund the
119 principal of the outstanding bonds to be refunded and the accrued interest thereon to the date
120 of such refunding, together with any redemption premium, amounts necessary to establish
121 reserve and escrow funds and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the
122 refunding. The authority may provide for the payment of interest on such refunding bonds at
123 a rate in excess of the bonds to be refunded;
124 (h) In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures
125 appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the
126 delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all

HB 2934 16
127 purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such
128 delivery;
129 (i) The authority is hereby declared to be performing a public function and bonds of
130 the authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and,
131 accordingly, interest thereon and income therefrom shall be exempt from income taxation by
132 the state of Missouri;
133 (11) To condemn any and all rights or property of any kind or character, necessary for
134 the purposes of the authority, in the manner provided in chapter 523, except that no property
135 now or hereafter vested in or held by the state, the county or the city shall be taken by the
136 authority without the authorization or consent of such party; provided however, that the
137 authority shall provide relocation benefits to all individuals and businesses, occupying said
138 property, in the same manner as such relocation benefits are provided pursuant to the federal
139 Relocation Assistance Act;
140 (12) To perform all other necessary and incidental functions, and to exercise such
141 additional powers as shall be conferred by the general assembly or by act of Congress.
142 2. The authority shall proceed to carry out its duties, functions and powers in
143 accordance with sections 67.650 to 67.658, and the authority is vested with all necessary and
144 appropriate powers not inconsistent with the constitution or the laws of the United States to
145 effectuate the same, except the power to levy taxes or assessments. In no event shall the state
146 be liable for any deficiency or indebtedness incurred by the authority.
147 3. The authority shall grant or award at least fifteen percent of all contracts,
148 employment opportunities, professional services and all other special contracts to persons
149 who are members of a racial minority group, as defined in section 37.013.
150 4. The authority and any city, county, other political subdivision or public agency
151 obtaining funds pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of
152 sections 34.073 and 34.076.
67.657. 1. Nothing contained in sections 67.650 to 67.658 shall impair the powers of
any county, municipality or other political subdivision to acquire, own, operate, develop or
improve any facility of the type the authority is given the right and power to own, operate,
develop or improve.
2. Any county, municipality or other political subdivision or public agency is
authorized to make gifts, donations, grants and contributions of money or real or personal
property to the authority, whether such money or property is derived from tax revenues or
from any other source.
3. Prior to August 28, 2026, the state of Missouri or any agency, department or
instrumentality thereof and the county, the city, or any political subdivision, public agency or
public body, or any combination thereof pursuant to sections 70.210 to 70.325, or otherwise,

HB 2934 17
are authorized to enter into contracts, agreements, leases and subleases with each other, the
authority and others to acquire, sell, convey, lease, sublease, own, operate, finance, develop or
improve, or any combination thereof, any facility of the type the authority is given the right to
construct, own, operate, develop or improve, including without limitation to agree to pay
rents or other fees or charges, subject to annual appropriations, and to mortgage, pledge,
assign, convey, or grant security in any interest which any such entity may have in such
facility.
4. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section 67.619, to the contrary, the governing body of the
county may submit to the voters of the county a tax not to exceed three and one-half percent
on the amount of sales or charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels
and motels situated within the county involved, and doing business within such county for the
purpose of funding a regional convention and sports complex authority and for other
recreational and entertainment purposes. If the governing body so orders, the election
officials of the county shall submit a proposition to the voters of such county at the next
statewide or countywide election or at a special election called for that purpose, such special
election to be held at the expense of the regional convention and sports complex authority.
Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following form at such
election:
Shall a sales tax of ______ percent on the amount of sales or charges
for all rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels be levied
in the county of ______ to provide certain funds for the regional
convention and sports complex authority and for general revenue
purposes?
YES NO

In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such county at such
election approve such proposition, then such sales tax shall be in full force and effect as of the
first day of the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
5. On and after the effective day of any tax authorized under the provisions of
subsection 4 of this section, the governing body of the county may adopt one of the two
following provisions for the collection and administration of the tax:
(1) The collector of revenue in such county may collect the tax pursuant to rules and
regulations promulgated by the governing body of the county. The tax to be collected by the
collector of revenue, less an amount not less than one percent and not more than three percent
which may be retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted to the county and deposited in

HB 2934 18
a special trust fund to be known as the "County Convention and Recreation Trust Fund" not
later than thirty days following the end of each month;
(2) The governing body of the county may enter into an agreement with the director
of revenue of the state of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in
subsection 4 of this section. In the event the governing body enters into an agreement with
the director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax authorized in
subsection 4 of this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the
administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of such tax, and the director of revenue
shall collect such additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported upon such forms and
under such administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of
revenue, and the director of revenue shall retain not less than one percent nor more than three
percent for cost of collection and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax to the
county for deposit in the county convention and recreation trust fund.
6. All funds deposited in the county convention and recreation trust fund shall,
subject to annual appropriation, be disbursed by the county only for [deposit in the regional
convention and sports complex fund] , first, to pay the county's share of any rent, fees or
charges payable pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease or sublease provided for in
subsection 3 of this section[; provided that in the event the county chooses to participate in a
qualifying project and enters into any such contract, agreement, lease or sublease, then any
funds in excess of its obligations hereunder which are deposited in the county convention and
recreation trust fund in any year pursuant to subsection 4 of this section may be appropriated
and disbursed by the county for general revenue purposes] , and the remainder, if any, shall
be disbursed annually to the regional convention and visitors commission established
under section 67.601.
7. [Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 6 of this section to the contrary,
funds deposited in the county convention and recreation trust fund pursuant to subsection 5 of
this section in excess of amounts payable as the county's share of any rent, fees or charges
payable pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease or sublease provided for in subsection 3 of
this section, including reasonable reserves for future payments of such amounts, shall not be
appropriated or paid except for funding of the regional convention and sports complex
authority or for regional convention and tourism purposes to the regional convention and
visitors commission established by section 67.601 if it is providing management and
operations services for a facility of the regional convention and sports complex authority of
which the state of Missouri, the city, and St. Louis County are lessees pursuant to a contract,
agreement or sublease with such lessees.] Provided that the county's share of any rent,
fees, or charges due and payable pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease, or sublease
provided for in subsection 3 of this section have been made for all contracts or

HB 2934 19
obligations entered into under subsection 3 of this section, all funds on deposit in the
county convention and recreation trust fund as of August 28, 2026, shall be deemed
excess funds and may be appropriated and disbursed by the county for general revenue
purposes. Beginning August 28, 2026, all funds deposited in the county convention and
recreation trust fund shall be distributed in accordance with subsection 6 of this section,
such that all excess funds shall be remitted to the regional convention and visitors
commission established under section 67.601 for the sole use by, and control of, such
commission. No funds generated by the tax imposed under this section shall be used for
the payment or support of the county's share of any rent, fees, or other charges payable
pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease, or sublease entered into, modified, or
amended after August 28, 2026, under subsection 3 of this section.
8. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of section 67.619 to the contrary, the governing body of the
city may repeal a present two-dollar license fee per occupied room levied in such city on
hotels and motels and submit to the voters of the city a tax not to exceed three and one-half
100 percent on the amount of sales or charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests
101 of hotels and motels situated within the city involved, and doing business within such city for
102 the purposes of funding debt service, lease payments or other expenses of an existing
103 convention center, including any southern expansion thereof, of such city, a regional
104 convention and sports complex authority or a regional convention and visitors commission or
105 any combination thereof as herein provided. If the governing body so orders, the election
106 officials of the city shall submit a proposition to the voters of such city at the next statewide
107 or citywide election or at a special election called for that purpose, such special election to be
108 held at the expense of the city. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in
109 substantially the following form at such election:
110 Shall the present two-dollar license fee per occupied room levied in the
111 city of ______ on hotels and motels be repealed and a sales tax of ____
112 __ percent on the amount of sales or charges for all rooms paid by the
113 transient guests of hotels and motels be levied in the city of ______ to
114 provide funds for convention, tourism and sports facilities purposes
115 and agencies?
116 YES NO
117
118 In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such city at such
119 election approve such proposition, then such two-dollar license fee per occupied room shall
120 be repealed and such sales tax shall be in full force and effect as of the first day of the
121 calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.

HB 2934 20
122 9. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of
123 subsection 8 of this section, the governing body of the city may adopt one of the two
124 following provisions for the collection and administration of the tax:
125 (1) The collector of revenue in such city may collect the tax pursuant to rules and
126 regulations promulgated by the governing body of the city. The tax to be collected by the
127 collector of revenue, less an amount not less than one percent and not more than three percent
128 which may be retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted to the city and deposited in a
129 special trust fund to be known as the "City Convention and Sports Facility Trust Fund" not
130 later than thirty days following the end of each month;
131 (2) The governing body of the city may enter into an agreement with the director of
132 revenue of the state of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in subsection
133 8 of this section. In the event the governing body enters into an agreement with the director
134 of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax authorized in subsection 8 of
135 this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration,
136 collection, enforcement and operation of such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect
137 such additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported upon such forms and under such
138 administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue, and the
139 director of revenue shall retain not less than one percent nor more than three percent for cost
140 of collection and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax to the city for deposit in
141 the convention and sports facility trust fund.
142 10. All funds deposited in the city convention and sports facility trust fund shall,
143 subject to annual appropriation, be disbursed by the city only for first, debt service, lease
144 payments or other expenses related to an existing convention center, including any [southern]
145 expansion thereof, of such city, second, to pay the city's share of any rent, fees or charges
146 payable pursuant to any lease provided for in subsection 3 of this section and third, the
147 remainder, if any, annually to the regional convention and visitors commission established by
148 section 67.601 [if it is providing management and operations services for a facility of the
149 regional convention and sports complex authority of which the state of Missouri, the city, and
150 St. Louis County are lessees pursuant to a contract, agreement or sublease with such lessees].
99.585. 1. (1) The state of Missouri, acting through the department of economic
development and the office of administration, or any other public body may, upon such terms
and with reasonable consideration as it may determine, expend funds for the purpose of
aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a land clearance
project or projects within the area in which the public body is authorized to act, or expend
funds for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, or
carrying out of a project or projects within or upon an area, property, or facilities
owned, managed, leased, maintained, or operated by a regional convention and visitors

HB 2934 21
commission, to develop, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, repair, or improve any tourism
infrastructure facilities existing as of August 28, 2019, and for which application is made and
approved by the department of economic development no later than August 28, [2020] 2028.
Any annual expenditure by a public body for such land clearance projects or regional
convention and visitors commission projectsrelated to tourism infrastructure facilities shall
be limited to a portion of tax revenues derived directly or indirectly from any such land
clearance project or projects or regional convention and visitors commission project or
projects supported by such annual expenditure within such designated land clearance project
area or areas or such areas or area owned, managed, leased, maintained, or operated by a
regional convention and visitors commission, as stated in an agreement entered into
between the authority or a regional convention and visitors commission established
pursuant to section 67.601, and the public body under subdivision (10) of section 99.580 or
section 67.607, as applicable; provided, however, that:
[(1)] (a) The term of state appropriations under any such agreement entered into
prior to August 28, 2021, shall not exceed twenty years, and for any agreement entered
into beginning August 28, 2021, and ending on August 28, 2028, shall not exceed [twenty]
thirty years;
[(2)] (b) The annual amount of the state appropriation authorized under this section
shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars per year for any fiscal year ending
on or before June 30, 2031, and four million five hundred thousand dollars per year for any
fiscal year thereafter. No such appropriation shall be made prior to July 1, 2021;
[(3)] (c) Any such land clearance project or regional convention and visitors
commission project shall be determined to produce a positive net fiscal impact for the state
over the term of such agreement, with such public or private assurances as the director of the
department of economic development may reasonably require; and
[(4)] (d) The director of the department of economic development shall make an
annual written report on behalf of the department to the governor and the general assembly
within ninety days of the end of each fiscal year detailing whether such land clearance project
or such regional convention and visitors commission projectproduced a positive net fiscal
impact for the state in the prior fiscal year and projecting the overall net fiscal impact to the
state over the term of such agreement.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, for any
regional convention and visitors commission projects as described in paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the annual appropriation amount shall not exceed four
million dollars per year for any fiscal year. No such appropriation shall be made prior
to July 1, 2027, for any tourism infrastructure facilities located in a convention district.

HB 2934 22
2. As used in this section, "tourism infrastructure facilities" means structures, fixtures,
systems, and facilities of multipurpose sports and entertainment venues with seating capacity
less than twenty-five thousand, including associated parking facilities, owned by any public
body and which the authority determines are a contributing factor in the attraction of sports,
recreational, entertainment, or meeting activities, either professional or amateur, commercial
or private. Such structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities may include, but are not limited
to, foundations, roofs, interior and exterior walls or windows, floors, steps, stairs, concourses,
hallways, restrooms, event or meeting spaces or other hospitality-related areas, concession or
food preparation areas, and services systems such as mechanical, gas utility, electrical,
lighting, communication, sound, sanitary, HVAC, elevator, escalator, plumbing, sprinkler,
cabling and wiring, life-safety security cameras, access deterrents, public safety
improvements, or other building systems. For purposes of this section, "tourism
infrastructure facilities" shall also include any existing convention center, including any
expansion thereof, or any sports stadiums; field houses; indoor and outdoor convention,
recreational, and entertainment facilities and centers; playing fields; parking facilities
and other suitable concessions; and all things incidental or necessary to a complex
suitable for all types of convention, entertainment, and meeting activities and for all
types of sports and recreation, that are owned, leased, operated, maintained, or
managed by the regional convention and visitors commission as contemplated by
sections 67.601 to 67.626, along with any of the aforementioned structures, systems, and
facilities associated therewith.
3. For any land clearance project for which funds are expended under this section on a
facility utilized by a professional sports franchise, if the owners of such franchise relocate the
franchise to another state during the period of the agreement entered into under subsection 1
of this section, such owners shall repay to the general revenue fund the amount of funds
expended by the state pursuant to such agreement.
✔